Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1907
County roads in township counties; construction or improvement; use of township road fund.

In counties under township organization, the electors of any township through which a county road passes, at any annual or special meeting, may direct the payment to the county, out of the township road fund, of such sum as may be determined upon and as the condition of such fund permits, to assist in the construction or improvement of the portion of said county road lying within such township.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. VI, § 7, p. 560.

This section and section 39 1524, when read together, contemplate that both counties and townships may build and improve public roads within a township. Butler County Dairy v. Butler County, 285 Neb. 408, 827 N.W.2d 267 (2013).